Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1353
Effect of registration.

(a) Subject to subsection (b) of this section, a Canadian judgment registered under section 25-1352 has the same effect provided in section 25-1343 for a judgment a court determines to be entitled to recognition.

(b) A Canadian judgment registered under section 25-1352 may not be enforced by sale or other disposition of property, or by seizure of property or garnishment, until thirty-one days after notice under section 25-1354 of registration is served. The court for cause may provide for a shorter or longer time. This subsection does not preclude use of relief available under law of this state other than the Uniform Registration of Canadian Money Judgments Act to prevent dissipation, disposition, or removal of property.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 17.